Utah statutes.
32A-12-605.   Consignment sales.
(1) This section adopts and makes applicable to all industry members,
including beer industry members, doing business in this state 27 U.S.C.
Section 205(d) and 27 C.F.R. Sections 11.1 through 11.46, which make it
unlawful for an industry member, directly or indirectly or through an
affiliate to sell, offer for sale, or contract to sell to any wholesaler or
retailer engaged in the sale of alcoholic beverages, or for any wholesaler or
retailer to purchase, offer to purchase, or contract to purchase any of those
products on consignment or under conditional sale or with the privilege of
return or on any basis otherwise than a bona fide sale, or where any part of
the transaction involves, directly or indirectly, the acquisition by that
person from the wholesaler or retailer or that person’s agreement to acquire
from the wholesaler or retailer other alcoholic beverages, if the sale,
purchase, offer, or contract is made in the course of interstate or foreign
commerce, or if the person or wholesaler or retailer engages in such practice
to an extent so as substantially to restrain or prevent transactions in
interstate or foreign commerce in any of those products or if the direct
effect of the sale, purchase, offer, or contract is to prevent, deter, hinder,
or restrict other persons from selling or offering for sale any of those
products to the wholesaler or retailer in interstate or foreign commerce.
(2)  This section does not apply to transactions involving solely the bona
fide return of merchandise for ordinary and usual commercial reasons arising
after the merchandise has been sold.
